src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
 
! VERBS
! =====

! Storing the VerbRoot members in a separate file
! But today we have some tests here


! =====================================
! ===========   Prefixes   ============
! =====================================


LEXICON VPref
n+OC+Sg1+:n VerbRoot ;
i+Refl+:i VerbRoot ;
i+Refl+n+OC+Sg1+:in VerbRoot ;
VerbRoot ;



! ... the verbstems are in ../stems/verbs.lexc



! =====================================
! ===========   Suffixes   ============
! =====================================



!LEXICON VB
!+V+OC+Sg1 VExt ;
!VExt ;
! The b-initials, cf. p. 26, 1st years...

LEXICON V
+V: VExt ;

LEXICON VExt
 +IW:iw VExt ;
 +EL:el VExt ;
 +Iq:iq VExt ;
 +AN:an VExt ;
 +AL:al VExt ;
 +EG:eg VExt ;
 +OLL:oll VExt ;
 +OG:og VExt ;
 +AK:ak VExt ;
 +AR:ar VExt ;
 +AM:am VExt ;
 +ALAL:alal VExt ;
 +AFAL:afal VExt ;
 +FAL:fal VExt ;
 +GO:go VExt ;
 VNext ; 

LEXICON VNext
 +Past:ile # ;
 +FNA:a # ;
 +FNE:e # ;

LEXICON VerbPart


! ontkenningsmorfeme
! ------------------

ga+NM:ga # ;
sa+NM:sa # ;
se+NM:se # ;
ga% se+NM:ga% se # ;


! onderwerpskakels
! ----------------

ke+SC+Sg1:ke # ;
re+SC+Pl1:re # ;
o+SC+Sg2:o # ;
le+SC+Pl2:le # ;
o+SC+CL1:o # ;
ba+SC+CL2:ba # ;
o+SC+CL3:o # ;
e+SC+CL4:e # ;
le+SC+CL5:le # ;
a+SC+CL6:a # ;
se+SC+CL7:se # ;
di+SC+CL8:di # ;
e+SC+CL9:e # ;
di+SC+CL10:di # ;
bo+SC+CL14:bo # ;
go+SC+CL15:go # ;


! konsekutieve skakels
! --------------------

ka+SC+Sg1+Cons:ka # ;
ra+SC+Pl1+Cons:ra # ;
wa+SC+Sg2+Cons:wa # ;
la+SC+Pl2+Cons:la # ;
a+SC+CL1+Cons:a # ;
ba+SC+CL2+Cons:ba # ;
wa+SC+CL3+Cons:wa # ;
ya+SC+CL4+Cons:ya # ;
la+SC+CL5+Cons:la # ;
a+SC+CL6+Cons:a # ;
sa+SC+CL7+Cons:sa # ;
tqa+SC+CL8+Cons:tqa # ;
ya+SC+CL9+Cons:ya # ;
tqa+SC+CL10+Cons:tqa # ;
bja+SC+CL14+Cons:bja # ;
gwa+SC+CL15+Cons:gwa # ;


! Andere 
! ------

a+Pres:a # ;
tlo+Fut:tlo # ;
tla+Fut:tla # ;
sa+Pers:sa # ;
ka+Pot:ka # ;
e+Lat:e # ;


! Voorwerpsskakels
! ----------------

n+OC+Sg1:n # ;
re+OC+Pl1:re # ;
go+OC+Sg2:go # ;
le+OC+Pl2:le # ;
mo+OC+CL1:mo # ;
ba+OC+CL2:ba # ;
o+OC+CL3:o # ;
e+OC+CL4:e # ;
le+OC+CL5:le # ;
a+OC+CL6:a # ;
se+OC+CL7:se # ;
di+OC+CL8:di # ;
e+OC+CL9:e # ;
di+OC+CL10:di # ;
bo+OC+CL14:bo # ;
go+OC+CL15:go # ;
