src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
arab V ;
bÙn V ;
dir V ;
for V ;
fÍl V ;
gopot£ V ;
hlÙmph V ;
hum V ;
i£ V ;
j V ;
jÍ£ V ;
kgop V ;
kgÍth V ;
lom V ;
makat£ V ;
mon V ;
mÙn V ;
neÍl V ;
obe V ;
pal V ;
rat V ;
rÍk V ;
sepel V ;
tseb V ;
u£ V ;
wÍt£ V ;
£upÍt£ V ;
Ím V ;
ÍtÍl V ;
ÙpÍd V ;
